California, session 20252026, AB396.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 121349.4 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:121349.4. (a) The Legislature finds and declares that entities that administer needles and syringes under this chapter have a duty and obligation to ensure that the needles and syringes are appropriately discarded and destroyed in a way that safeguards the health and safety of the surrounding community. (b) An entity, as described in subdivision (d) of Section 121349, that provides needle and syringe exchange services under this chapter shall do all of the following: (1) Ensure that each needle or syringe dispensed by the entity is appropriately discarded and destroyed. (2) Ensure that each needle or syringe dispensed by the entity includes a unique serial number printed in type on an adhesive-affixed label on the needle or syringe.(3) Keep records of the unique serial number of every needle and syringe dispensed by the entity, including the date and time the item was provided to a recipient. (4) Keep records of the unique serial number of every needle and syringe surrendered to the entity. (5) Keep records of the unique serial number of every needle and syringe destroyed and disposed of by the entity. (6) On a quarterly basis, disclose to the department and the local health officer of the participating jurisdiction the following information:(A) The total number of needles and syringes dispensed by the entity in the previous quarter.(B) The total number of needles and syringes surrendered to the entity in the previous quarter.(C) The total number of needles and syringes destroyed and disposed of by the entity in the previous quarter.(D) A searchable list of the unique serial number of each needle and syringe dispensed by, surrendered to, and destroyed by, the entity in the previous quarter.(c) For purposes of this chapter, “printed in type” means a legible array of characters printed by a machine that identify the specific serial number of a needle or syringe. “Printed in type” does not mean handwritten type.(d) The department and the local health officer of the participating jurisdiction shall retain the information reported pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) for a period of five years. (e) (1) If a needle or syringe is found abandoned or improperly discarded and is subsequently reported to the local health officer of the participating jurisdiction, the unique serial number shall be compared against the data reported pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) to determine the dispensing entity. Once identified, the local health officer shall notify the department of the violation. (2) Upon receiving notice of a violation, the department shall assess an administrative penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000) per violation against the offending entity. For purposes of this section, each needle or syringe reported constitutes a separate violation. (f) If an entity is found to have reported inaccurate data required by paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) for the purpose of defrauding the department or local health officer, the department shall issue the following:(1) For an initial violation, an administrative penalty of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).(2) For a subsequent violation within five calendar years, an administrative penalty of forty thousand dollars ($40,000) and a suspension of operation.(g) The Needle and Syringe Disposal Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury for the purpose of receipt of administrative penalties assessed pursuant to subdivisions (e) and (f). The moneys in the fund shall be available for expenditure by the department, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purposes of implementing this section.(h) This section does not preclude the department from providing supplemental funding to the local health officer of participating jurisdictions to assist in implementation of this section, including reimbursement for costs associated with needle and syringe collection and disposal. (i) The data collecting and reporting requirements in this section do not require the collection or disclosure of personally identifiable information for either the individual supplying the needle or syringe or its recipient. SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.